Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 2 EQUIPMENT
42-4-236. Child restraint systems required - definitions - exemptions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Child care center" means a facility required to be licensed under the "Child Care Licensing Act", part 1 of article 6 of title 26, C.R.S.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (SB 10-110), ch. 294, p. 1365, § 3, effective August 1, 2010.)

"Child restraint system" means a specially designed seating system that is designed to protect, hold, or restrain a child in a motor vehicle in such a way as to prevent or minimize injury to the child in the event of a motor vehicle accident that is either permanently affixed to a motor vehicle or is affixed to such vehicle by a safety belt or a universal attachment system, and that meets the federal motor vehicle safety standards set forth in section 49 CFR 571.213, as amended.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (SB 10-110), ch. 294, p. 1365, § 3, effective August 1, 2010.)

"Motor vehicle" means a passenger car; a pickup truck; or a van, minivan, or sport utility vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of less than ten thousand pounds. "Motor vehicle" does not include motorcycles that are not autocycles, low-power scooters, motorscooters, motorbicycles, motorized bicycles, and farm tractors and implements of husbandry designed primarily or exclusively for use in agricultural operations.

"Safety belt" means a lap belt, a shoulder belt, or any other belt or combination of belts installed in a motor vehicle to restrain drivers and passengers, except any such belt that is physically a part of a child restraint system. "Safety belt" includes the anchorages, the buckles, and all other equipment directly related to the operation of safety belts. Proper use of a safety belt means the shoulder belt, if present, crosses the shoulder and chest and the lap belt crosses the hips, touching the thighs.

"Seating position" means any motor vehicle interior space intended by the motor vehicle manufacturer to provide seating accommodation while the motor vehicle is in motion.

Unless exempted pursuant to subsection (3) of this section and except as otherwise provided in subparagraphs (II) and (III) of this paragraph (a), every child who is under eight years of age and who is being transported in this state in a motor vehicle or in a vehicle operated by a child care center, shall be properly restrained in a child restraint system, according to the manufacturer's instructions.
(2) (a) (I) Unless exempted pursuant to subsection (3) of this section and except as otherwise provided in subparagraphs (II) and (III) of this paragraph (a), every child who is under eight years of age and who is being transported in this state in a motor vehicle or in a vehicle operated by a child care center, shall be properly restrained in a child restraint system, according to the manufacturer's instructions.

If the child is less than one year of age and weighs less than twenty pounds, the child shall be properly restrained in a rear-facing child restraint system in a rear seat of the vehicle.

If the child is one year of age or older, but less than four years of age, and weighs less than forty pounds, but at least twenty pounds, the child shall be properly restrained in a rear-facing or forward-facing child restraint system.

Unless excepted pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, every child who is at least eight years of age but less than sixteen years of age who is being transported in this state in a motor vehicle or in a vehicle operated by a child care center, shall be properly restrained in a safety belt or child restraint system according to the manufacturer's instructions.

If a parent is in the motor vehicle, it is the responsibility of the parent to ensure that his or her child or children are provided with and that they properly use a child restraint system or safety belt system. If a parent is not in the motor vehicle, it is the responsibility of the driver transporting a child or children, subject to the requirements of this section, to ensure that such children are provided with and that they properly use a child restraint system or safety belt system.

Except as provided in section 42-2-105.5 (4), subsection (2) of this section does not apply to a child who:

Repealed.

Is less than eight years of age and is being transported in a motor vehicle as a result of a medical or other life-threatening emergency and a child restraint system is not available;

Is being transported in a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in section 42-2-402 (4)(a), that is operated by a child care center;

Is the driver of a motor vehicle and is subject to the safety belt requirements provided in section 42-4-237;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (SB 11-227), ch. 295, p. 1399, § 1, effective June 7, 2011.)

Is being transported in a motor vehicle that is operated in the business of transporting persons for compensation or hire by or on behalf of a common carrier or a contract carrier as those terms are defined in section 40-10.1-101, C.R.S., or an operator of a luxury limousine service as defined in section 40-10.1-301, C.R.S.

The division of highway safety shall implement a program for public information and education concerning the use of child restraint systems and the provisions of this section.

No person shall use a safety belt or child restraint system, whichever is applicable under the provisions of this section, for children under sixteen years of age in a motor vehicle unless it conforms to all applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards.

Any violation of this section shall not constitute negligence per se or contributory negligence per se.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (7), any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

A minor driver under eighteen years of age who violates this section shall be punished in accordance with section 42-2-105.5 (5)(b).

The fine may be waived if the defendant presents the court with satisfactory evidence of proof of the acquisition, purchase, or rental of a child restraint system by the time of the court appearance.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2010, (SB 10-110), ch. 294, p. 1365, § 3, effective August 1, 2010.)

and (11) Repealed.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2268, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1)(a), (2), (3), (5), and (8) amended and (1)(a.5) added, p. 327, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1)(a) amended, p. 267, § 23, effective July 1.

L. 99:

IP(3) amended, p. 1382, § 7, effective July 1; (3)(a) repealed, p. 1349, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2002:

(1) and (2) amended and (9) and (10) added, pp. 1215, 1217, §§ 2, 3, effective August 1, 2003.

L. 2003:

(2)(b) amended, p. 2358, § 1, effective June 3; (2)(b)(I) amended and (2)(b)(I.5) added, p. 560, § 1, effective August 1.

L. 2006:

(10) repealed, p. 1512, § 72, effective June 1; (7) amended, p. 439, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(a.3), (1)(a.7), (1)(b), (2), (3), (8), and (9) amended and (1)(a.8) and (11) added, (SB 10-110), ch. 294, pp. 1365, 1364, §§ 3, 2, effective August 1.

L. 2011:

IP(3) and (3)(e) amended, (SB 11-227), ch. 295, p. 1399, § 1, effective June 7; IP(3) and (3)(f) amended, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 426, § 27, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(1)(a.8) amended, (HB 17-1044), ch. 72, p. 230, § 6, effective March 23.

42-4-237. Safety belt systems - mandatory use - exemptions - penalty.

As used in this section:

"Motor vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle intended primarily for use and operation on the public highways, including passenger cars, station wagons, vans, taxicabs, ambulances, motor homes, and pickups. The term does not include motorcycles, low-power scooters, passenger buses, school buses, and farm tractors and implements of husbandry designed primarily or exclusively for use in agricultural operations.

"Safety belt system" means a system utilizing a lap belt, a shoulder belt, or any other belt or combination of belts installed in a motor vehicle or an autocycle to restrain drivers and passengers, which system conforms to federal motor vehicle safety standards.

Unless exempted pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, every driver of and every front seat passenger in a motor vehicle and every driver of and every passenger in an autocycle equipped with a safety belt system shall wear a fastened safety belt while the motor vehicle is being operated on a street or highway in this state.

Except as provided in section 42-2-105.5, the requirement of subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to:

A child required by section 42-4-236 to be restrained by a child restraint system;

A member of an ambulance team, other than the driver, while involved in patient care;

A peace officer as described in section 16-2.5-101, C.R.S., while performing official duties so long as the performance of said duties is in accordance with rules and regulations applicable to said officer which are at least as restrictive as subsection (2) of this section and which only provide exceptions necessary to protect the officer;

A person with a physically or psychologically disabling condition whose physical or psychological disability prevents appropriate restraint by a safety belt system if such person possesses a written statement by a physician certifying the condition, as well as stating the reason why such restraint is inappropriate;

A person driving or riding in a motor vehicle not equipped with a safety belt system due to the fact that federal law does not require such vehicle to be equipped with a safety belt system;

A rural letter carrier of the United States postal service while performing duties as a rural letter carrier; and

A person operating a motor vehicle which does not meet the definition of "commercial vehicle" as that term is defined in section 42-4-235 (1)(a) for commercial or residential delivery or pickup service; except that such person shall be required to wear a fastened safety belt during the time period prior to the first delivery or pickup of the day and during the time period following the last delivery or pickup of the day.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (4), any person who operates a motor vehicle while such person or any passenger is in violation of the requirement of subsection (2) of this section commits a class B traffic infraction. Penalties collected pursuant to this subsection (4) shall be transmitted to the appropriate authority pursuant to the provisions of section 42-1-217 (1)(e) and (2).

A minor driver under eighteen years of age who violates this section shall be punished in accordance with section 42-2-105.5 (5)(b).

No driver in a motor vehicle shall be cited for a violation of subsection (2) of this section unless such driver was stopped by a law enforcement officer for an alleged violation of articles 1 to 4 of this title other than a violation of this section.

Testimony at a trial for a violation charged pursuant to subsection (4) of this section may include:

Testimony by a law enforcement officer that the officer observed the person charged operating a motor vehicle while said operator or any passenger was in violation of the requirement of subsection (2) of this section; or

Evidence that the driver removed the safety belts or knowingly drove a vehicle from which the safety belts had been removed.

Evidence of failure to comply with the requirement of subsection (2) of this section shall be admissible to mitigate damages with respect to any person who was involved in a motor vehicle accident and who seeks in any subsequent litigation to recover damages for injuries resulting from the accident. Such mitigation shall be limited to awards for pain and suffering and shall not be used for limiting recovery of economic loss and medical payments.

The office of transportation safety in the department of transportation shall continue its program for public information and education concerning the benefits of wearing safety belts and shall include within such program the requirements and penalty of this section.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2269, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(4) amended, p. 953, § 7, effective May 25.

L. 99:

IP(3) amended, p. 1382, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(3) amended, p. 1034, § 75, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

(3)(c) amended, p. 1623, § 40, effective August 6.

L. 2006:

(4) amended, p. 439, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1276, § 50, effective October 1.

L. 2017:

(1)(b) and (2) amended, (HB 17-1044), ch. 72, p. 230, § 7, effective March 23.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-236 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-237 was relocated to § 42-4-1411.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1999 act amending the introductory portion to subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 1999.

42-4-238. Blue and red lights - illegal use or possession.

A person shall not be in actual physical control of a vehicle, except an authorized emergency vehicle as defined in section 42-1-102 (6), that the person knows contains a lamp or device that is designed to display, or that is capable of displaying if affixed or attached to the vehicle, a red or blue light visible directly in front of the center of the vehicle.

It shall be an affirmative defense that the defendant was:

A peace officer as described in section 16-2.5-101, C.R.S.; or

In actual physical control of a vehicle expressly authorized by a chief of police or sheriff to contain a lamp or device that is designed to display, or that is capable of displaying if affixed or attached to the vehicle, a red or blue light visible from directly in front of the center of the vehicle; or

A member of a volunteer fire department or a volunteer ambulance service who possesses a permit from the fire chief of the fire department or chief executive officer of the ambulance service through which the volunteer serves to operate a vehicle pursuant to section 42-4-222 (1)(b); or

A vendor who exhibits, sells, or offers for sale a lamp or device designed to display, or that is capable of displaying, if affixed or attached to the vehicle, a red or blue light; or

A collector of fire engines, fire suppression vehicles, or ambulances and the vehicle to which the red or blue lamps were affixed is valued for the vehicle's historical interest or as a collector's item.

A violation of this section is a class 1 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1080, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(2)(e) added, p. 195, § 1, effective July 1.

42-4-239. Misuse of a wireless telephone - definitions - penalty - preemption.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Emergency" means a situation in which a person:

Has reason to fear for such person's life or safety or believes that a criminal act may be perpetrated against such person or another person, requiring the use of a wireless telephone while the car is moving; or

Reports a fire, a traffic accident in which one or more injuries are apparent, a serious road hazard, a medical or hazardous materials emergency, or a person who is driving in a reckless, careless, or otherwise unsafe manner.

"Operating a motor vehicle" means driving a motor vehicle on a public highway, but "operating a motor vehicle" shall not mean maintaining the instruments of control while the motor vehicle is at rest in a shoulder lane or lawfully parked.

"Use" means talking on or listening to a wireless telephone or engaging the wireless telephone for text messaging or other similar forms of manual data entry or transmission.

"Wireless telephone" means a telephone that operates without a physical, wireline connection to the provider's equipment. The term includes, without limitation, cellular and mobile telephones.

A person under eighteen years of age shall not use a wireless telephone while operating a motor vehicle. This subsection (2) does not apply to acts specified in subsection (3) of this section.

A person shall not use a wireless telephone for the purpose of engaging in text messaging or other similar forms of manual data entry or transmission while operating a motor vehicle.

Subsection (2) or (3) of this section shall not apply to a person who is using the wireless telephone:

To contact a public safety entity; or

During an emergency.

A person who operates a motor vehicle in violation of subsection (2) of this section commits a class A traffic infraction as defined in section 42-4-1701 (3), and the court or the department of revenue shall assess a fine of fifty dollars.

A second or subsequent violation of subsection (2) of this section is a class A traffic infraction as defined in section 42-4-1701 (3), and the court or the department of revenue shall assess a fine of one hundred dollars.

(5.5) (a) Except as provided in subsections (5.5)(b) and (5.5)(c) of this section, a person who operates a motor vehicle in violation of subsection (3) of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense, and the court or the department shall assess a fine of three hundred dollars.

If the person's actions are the proximate cause of bodily injury to another, the person commits a class 1 misdemeanor traffic offense and shall be punished as provided in section 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(II).

If the person's actions are the proximate cause of death to another, the person commits a class 1 misdemeanor traffic offense and shall be punished as provided in section 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(II).

An operator of a motor vehicle shall not be cited for a violation of subsection (2) of this section unless the operator was under eighteen years of age and a law enforcement officer saw the operator use, as defined in paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section, a wireless telephone.

An operator of a motor vehicle shall not be cited for a violation of subsection (3) of this section unless a law enforcement officer saw the operator use a wireless telephone for the purpose of engaging in text messaging or other similar forms of manual data entry or transmission, in a manner that caused the operator to drive in a careless and imprudent manner, without due regard for the width, grade, curves, corners, traffic, and use of the streets and highways and all other attendant circumstances, as prohibited by section 42-4-1402.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to authorize the seizure and forfeiture of a wireless telephone, unless otherwise provided by law.

This section does not restrict operation of an amateur radio station by a person who holds a valid amateur radio operator license issued by the federal communications commission.

The general assembly finds and declares that use of wireless telephones in motor vehicles is a matter of statewide concern.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 267, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1094), ch. 375, p. 2043, § 1, effective December 1.

L. 2017:

(2), (3), (5), and (6)(b) amended and (5.5) added, (SB 17-027), ch. 279, p. 1523, § 1, effective June 1.

42-4-240. Low-speed electric vehicle equipment requirements.

A low-speed electric vehicle shall conform with applicable federal manufacturing equipment standards. Any person who operates a low-speed electric vehicle in violation of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-075), ch. 418, p. 2325, § 15, effective August 5.

42-4-241. Unlawful removal of tow-truck signage - unlawful usage of tow-truck signage.

A person, other than a towing carrier or peace officer as described in section 16-2.5-101, C.R.S., commits the crime of unlawful removal of tow-truck signage if:

A towing carrier has placed a tow-truck warning sign on the driver-side window of a vehicle to be towed or, if window placement is impracticable, in another location on the driver-side of the vehicle; and

The vehicle to be towed is within fifty feet of the towing carrier vehicle; and

The person removes the tow-truck warning sign from the vehicle before the tow is completed.

A person commits the crime of unlawful usage of tow-truck signage if the person places a tow-truck warning sign on a vehicle when the vehicle is not in the process of being towed or when the vehicle is occupied.

A towing carrier may permit an owner of the vehicle to be towed to retrieve any personal items from the vehicle before the vehicle is towed.

A person who violates subsection (1) of this section commits a class 3 misdemeanor.

For purposes of this section, "tow-truck warning sign" means a sign that is at least eight inches by eight inches, is either yellow or orange, and states the following:

WARNING: This vehicle is in tow. Attempting to operate or operating this vehicle may result in criminal prosecution and may lead to injury or death to you or another person.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (SB 11-260), ch. 298, p. 1433, § 2, effective July 1.

Cross references:

In 2011, this section was added by the "Allen Rose Tow-truck Safety Act". For the short title, see section 1 of chapter 298, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.

42-4-242. Automated driving systems - safe harbor.

A person may use an automated driving system to drive a motor vehicle or to control a function of a motor vehicle if the system is capable of complying with every state and federal law that applies to the function that the system is operating.

Any provision in articles 1 to 3 of this title 42 and this article 4 that by its nature regulates a human driver, including section 42-2-101, does not apply to an automated driving system, except for laws regulating the physical driving of a vehicle.

If an automated driving system is not capable of complying with every state and federal law that applies to the function the system is operating, a person shall not test the system unless approved by the Colorado state patrol and the Colorado department of transportation, in accordance with a process overseen by the Colorado state patrol and the Colorado department of transportation.

A person who violates this subsection (3) commits a class B traffic infraction. Upon determining that there is probable cause to believe that a motor vehicle was used to violate this subsection (3), a peace officer of the state patrol may impound or immobilize the motor vehicle until the person who violated this section has obtained the required approval in accordance with subsection (3)(a) of this section or signed an affidavit, under penalty of perjury, stating the person's intention to cease using the automated driving system in Colorado without the required approval.

The Colorado department of transportation shall report to the transportation legislation review committee by September 1 of each year, concerning the testing of automated driving systems in Colorado. The first report is due by September 1, 2018. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136, the reporting requirement contained in this subsection (4) continues indefinitely.

Liability for a crash involving an automated driving system driving a motor vehicle that is not under human control is determined in accordance with applicable state law, federal law, or common law.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (SB 17-213), ch. 277, p. 1518, § 4, effective August 9.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-213, see section 1 of chapter 277, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.